Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5988.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings. The general assembly finds and declares:
(1) Rhode Island pediatricians are facing a major workforce crisis which is causing
decreased healthcare access for children. Without significant intervention, the situation is expected
to worsen and negatively impact not only the health or our children, but the long-term health of the
adults in our state.
(2) According to a 2024 survey of Rhode Island pediatricians, less than fifty percent (50%)
of pediatric primary care offices were accepting new or transfer patients other than newborns or
siblings of current patients. Families that move to Rhode Island to work, or those whose pediatric
providers retire, cannot find a doctor to care for their child.
(3) The same survey showed that forty-two (42) of one hundred fifty-six (156), twenty-six
and nine-tenths percent (26.9%) of respondents, stated that they plan to retire within the next six
(6) years. This correlates to a potential loss of seventy-one (71) providers when applied to the two
hundred sixty-two (262) pediatricians who are currently practicing primary care in Rhode Island,
and a projected net loss of forty (40) to forty-five (45) providers by 2030. Current providers do not
have the capacity to increase panel size to accommodate more patients as most are working with
full patient loads.
(4) Rhode Island also suffers from shortages in pediatric subspecialists and child
psychiatrists, causing unnecessary delays in care for children. The American Academy of Pediatrics

has predicted that despite increasing medical complexity of American children, the supply of
specialists will continue to decline without significant investments in the workforce. In Rhode
Island, current Medicaid payment rates for pediatric specialists is lower than that for general
pediatricians, as they were not included in the last rate increase in the governor’s budget.
(5) On average, Medicaid payment rates in Rhode Island are approximately twenty-five
percent (25%) lower than those in Massachusetts and Connecticut, which causes significant
difficulty in recruiting new pediatric providers to our state.
(6) Medicaid rates have a significant impact on the availability of pediatric health care to
children statewide, regardless of income. Nationally and in Rhode Island, pediatric health care
providers are more dependent on Medicaid than adult health care providers to keep their practices
open and operating because Medicaid covers a large portion of children’s health care. In Rhode
Island in 2022, fifty-eight percent (58%) of children under age seven (7), and fifty-four percent
(54%) of children ages zero to eighteen (18) were covered by Medicaid insurance. Only eight
percent (8%) of Rhode Islanders over age nineteen (19) were covered by Medicaid. In 2019,
children represented about twenty-five percent (25%) of the U.S. population, yet received less than
ten percent (10%) of total health care spending.
(7) Spending on health care during childhood has been documented to improve health into
adulthood, thereby reducing future costs. Investments in children’s health care can produce
improved outcomes in subsequent generations.
SECTION 2. Chapter 42-12.3 of the General Laws entitled "Health Care for Children and
Pregnant Women" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-12.3-17. Access to pediatric health care.
The executive office of health and human services shall pursue a Medicaid state plan
amendment and allocate sufficient state general revenue to increase Medicaid payment rates to
equal one hundred thirty percent (130%) of Medicare rates for all payment codes for outpatient
clinical services rendered to patients under nineteen (19) years old on or before October 1, 2025 to
ensure rates allow pediatric providers to provide adequate services for their current patient panels.
Increased rates will allow practices to recruit and retain pediatric providers to include, but not be
limited to, pediatricians, pediatric specialists, child psychiatrists, family medicine physicians, nurse
practitioners, and physician’s assistants to improve the current workforce shortage, and offset the
projected shortfall in replacing physicians who plan to retire.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001642
========
LC001642 - Page 2 of 3